Washington statutes.
RCW 36.34.040

Public hearing.

The board shall hold a public hearing upon a proposal to dispose of county property at the day and hour fixed in the notice at its usual place of business and admit evidence offered for and against the propriety and advisability of the proposed action. Any taxpayer in person or by counsel may submit evidence and submit an argument, but the board may limit the number to three on a side.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.34.040. Prior: 1945 c 254 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 4014-3; prior: 1891 c 76 s 2, part; RRS s 4008, part.]